Massachusetts, session 194th, H125.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 128 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting at the end
thereof the following new section:-
Section XX. The department shall promulgate regulations relative to post-construction
soil performance guidelines that shall include but not be limited to soil depth and quality, carbon
storage capacity, storm water runoff, water quality, fertilizer and nutrient input mitigation, and
compaction or infiltration capacity. The department may limit the scope of those regulations
regionally as appropriate. The department shall work in conjunction with the University of
Massachusetts Amherst Extension to ensure any regulations of the department relative to soil
guidelines are consistent with the program’s published information, educational materials and
other public outreach programs. Said regulations shall also be consistent with healthy soils
practices, as defined by Section 7A of Chapter 128.
of 3

The department may establish fines for violations of regulations promulgated under this
subsection which shall not exceed $250 for a first offense, $500 for a second offense and $1000
for a third or subsequent offense. A person aggrieved by the assessment of a fine under this
subsection may appeal that fine by filing a notice of appeal with the division of administrative
law appeals within 10 days of the receipt of the notice of the fine. An appellant shall be granted a
hearing before the division of administrative law appeals under chapter 30A. The hearing officer
may affirm or, if the aggrieved person demonstrates by a preponderance of evidence that the fine
was erroneously issued, vacate or modify the fine. A person aggrieved by a decision of the
hearing officer may file an appeal in the superior court under said chapter 30A.
SECTION 2. Section 64 of said chapter 128, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking the definition of “Lawn” and inserting after the definition of “Fertilizer material”, the
following new definitions:-
“Functional turf”, turf that is located on private property or on recreational use areas or
other space that is regularly used for civic, community, or recreational purposes which may
include but not be limited to residential lawns, playgrounds, sports fields, parks, golf courses,
picnic grounds, cemeteries and amphitheaters.
“Utility turf”, turf that is established primarily to fulfill ecological or practical functions
which may include but not be limited to stabilizing soil, preventing erosion from wind or water,
sequestering carbon, mitigating heat island effect, vegetative buffer strips from watersheds
capturing and filtering urban pollutants and for community planning and safety purposes.
And, by inserting after the definition of “Ton”, the following definition:-
of 3

“Turf”, a natural living ground cover that produces a dense canopy of contiguous plant
coverage and an interconnected subsurface root network comprised of any of the grass plants of
the Poaceae family or living plants in other taxa serving a similar purpose as often found in
lawns and commercial green spaces.
of 3